Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-702.02
Controlled-access facilities; frontage roads.

A city of the primary class is authorized to designate, establish, design, construct, maintain, vacate, alter, improve and regulate frontage roads within the boundaries of any present or hereafter acquired right-of-way and to exercise the same jurisdiction over such frontage roads as is authorized over controlled-access facilities. Such frontage roads may be connected to or separated from the controlled-access facilities at such places as the city shall determine to be consistent with public safety. Upon the construction of any frontage road, any right of access between the controlled-access facility and property abutting or adjacent to such frontage shall terminate and ingress to and egress from the frontage road shall be provided at such places as will afford reasonable and safe connections.

Laws 1959, c. 45, § 2, p. 227.